New York, session 2025-2026, A4401.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 12-106 of the election law, as amended by chapter 2 215 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 12-106. Electoral college; vote of the electors. Immediately after 4 the organization of the electoral college, the electors shall then and 5 there vote by ballot for president and vice president, but no elector 6 shall vote for more than one person who is a resident of this state. 7 Two electoral votes shall be given to the statewide winner and one elec- 8 toral vote shall be given to each congressional district based on the 9 plurality of votes in such district. They shall name in separate ballots 10 the persons voted for as president and vice president. They shall make 11 and sign six certificates of vote of all the votes given by them, each 12 of which certificates shall contain two distinct lists, one with the 13 votes for president and one with the votes for vice president. There 14 shall be annexed to each of the certificates of vote one of the lists of 15 electors which shall have been furnished to them by the state board of 16 elections pursuant to section 12-102 of this title. They shall seal up 17 the certificates of vote so made and certify upon each that the lists of 18 all the votes of this state given for president and vice president are 19 contained therein. 20 Notwithstanding any other section of law besides title four of this 21 article, each elector shall cast [his or her] such elector's ballot for 22 president and vice president for the candidates for these offices who 23 were nominated by the political party that nominated the presidential 24 elector. Refusal or failure to vote for the candidates for president and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04479-01-5 A. 4401 2 1 vice president who were nominated by the political party that nominated 2 the presidential elector shall constitute a resignation from the office 3 of elector, and any such vote by an elector shall not be recorded. The 4 ballots used by the elector shall bear the name of the elector. The 5 remaining electors shall forthwith fill the vacancy in accordance with 6 section 12-104 of this title. Nothing in this subdivision shall be 7 interpreted as modifying or repealing title four of this article, the 8 agreement among the states to elect the president by national popular 9 vote. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 11 electors for all elections occurring on and after such date.